Hawaii statutes.
[§319-5] Rules. The director may
adopt, amend, and repeal rules necessary or desirable to the implementation of
this chapter, subject to the provisions of chapter 91. [L 1976, c 132, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next